nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fekting > Treningsutstyr for fekting: Tilbehør til kroppsledning for fekting; Kroppssnorer for fekting; Fektedukker; Fottrenere for fekting; Grepstrening for fekting; Utfallstrener for fekting; Øvelsesstriper for fekting; Fektemål; Treningssekker for fekting; Verktøy for testing og vedlikehold av fektevåpen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Miekkailu > Miekkailun harjoitteluvälineet: Miekkailun vartalojohtojen lisävarusteet; Miekkailun vartalonauhat; Miekkailunuket; Miekkailun jalkaharjoitteluvälineet; Miekkailun oteharjoitteluvälineet; Miekkailun syöksyharjoitteluvälineet; Miekkailun harjoitusnauhat; Miekkailun maalitaulut; Miekkailun harjoittelusäkit; Miekkailuaseen testaus- ja huoltotyökalut
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Esgrima > Auxiliares de treino para esgrima: Acessórios para cabos de corpo de esgrima; Cabos de corpo para esgrima; Manequins de esgrima; Artigos de treino de pés para esgrima; Artigos de treino de punho para esgrima; Artigos de treino de estocada para esgrima; Tiras de treino para esgrima; Alvos para esgrima; Sacos de treino para esgrima; Ferramentas de teste e manutenção de armas de esgrima
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Šerm > Tréninkové pomůcky na šerm: Příslušenství k tělovým kabelům pro šerm; Šňůry na šerm; Šermířské figuríny; Šermířské trenažéry pro práci nohou; Šermířské trenažéry úchopu; Trenažéry pro šermířské výpady; Cvičné pásy pro šerm; Šermířské terče; Šermířské tašky na trénink; Nástroje na údržbu a testování šermířských zbraní
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Escrime > Aides à l'entraînement à l'escrime: Accessoires de fils de corps d'escrime; Cordes de corps d'escrime; Mannequins d'escrime; Entraînement au jeu de jambes d'escrime; Entraînement à l’adhérence d’escrime; Entraînement à la fente d’escrime; Bandes d'entraînement d'escrime; Cibles d'escrime; Sacs d'entraînement d'escrime; Outils de test et d'entretien des armes d'escrime
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фехтовка > Помощни средства за тренировка по фехтовка: Аксесоари за кабели за фехтовка; Кабели за тяло при фехтовка; Тренировъчни манекени за фехтовка; Уреди за отработване на движенията на краката при фехтовка; Уреди за отработване на захвата при фехтовка; Уреди за отработване на нападателни движения при фехтовка; Тренировъчни пътеки за фехтовка; Мишени за фехтовка; Тренировъчни чанти за фехтовка; Инструменти за тестване и поддръжка на оръжия за фехтовка
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フェンシング用品 > フェンシング練習器具: フェンシング用ボディコードアクセサリー; フェンシング用ボディコード; フェンシング用ダミー; フェンシング用フットワークトレーナー; フェンシング用グリップトレーナー; フェンシング用ランジトレーナー; フェンシング練習用ストリップ; フェンシング用ターゲット; フェンシング用トレーニングバッグ; フェンシング用武器テスト・メンテナンスツール
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Sabljanje > Pripomočki za vadbo sabljanja: Dodatki za sabljaške žice; Sabljaške žice; Vadbene lutke za sabljanje; Orodja za vadbo korakov in gibov pri sabljanju; Orodja za izboljšanje drže pri sabljanju; Pripomočki za vadbo napada pri sabljanju; Vadbeni trakovi za sabljanje; Tarče za sabljanje; Vreče za vadbo sabljanja; Orodja za testiranje in vzdrževanje orožja za sabljanje
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fechten > Fecht-Trainingshilfen: Zubehör für Fecht-Körperkabel; Fecht-Körperkabel; Fecht-Dummies; Fecht-Beinarbeitstrainer; Fecht-Grifftrainer; Fecht-Ausfalltrainer; Fechtübungsstreifen; Fechtziele; Fecht-Trainingstaschen; Werkzeuge zur Prüfung & Wartung von Fechtwaffen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ξιφασκία > Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα ξιφασκίας: Αξεσουάρ καλωδίων σώματος ξιφασκίας; Καλώδια καταγραφής χτυπήματος ξιφασκίας; Ομοιώματα ξιφασκίας; Διατάξεις προπόνησης ποδιών ξιφασκίας; Διατάξεις προπόνησης λαβής ξιφασκίας; Προπονητικός εξοπλισμός εφορμήσεων ξιφασκίας; Ταινίες προπόνησης ξιφασκίας; Στόχοι ξιφασκίας; Σάκοι προπόνησης ξιφασκίας; Εργαλεία ελέγχου και συντήρησης όπλων ξιφασκίας
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấu kiếm hiện đại > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện đấu kiếm: Phụ kiện dây kết nối đấu kiếm; Dây nối cơ thể khi đấu kiếm; Hình nộm tập đấu kiếm; Giày tập chân đấu kiếm; Dụng cụ tập cầm nắm đấu kiếm; Dụng cụ tập luyện tấn công bất ngờ môn đấu kiếm; Đường tập luyện đấu kiếm; Bia đấu kiếm; Túi đựng đồ tập luyện đấu kiếm; Dụng cụ bảo dưỡng và kiểm tra vũ khí đấu kiếm
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Szermierka > Pomoce treningowe do szermierki: Akcesoria do przewodów osobistych do szermierki; Linki do szermierki; Manekiny do szermierki; Trenażery szermiercze nogi; Trenażery szermiercze chwyt; Trenażery szermiercze wypad; Taśmy treningowe do szermierki; Cele szermiercze; Torby treningowe do szermierki; Narzędzia do testowania i konserwacji broni szermierczej
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Esgrima > Auxílios de treinamento para esgrima: Acessórios para cabos de corpo de esgrima; Cabos corporais para esgrima; Bonecos para esgrima; Treinadores de trabalho de pés para esgrima; Treinadores de empunhadura para esgrima; Treinadores de lunge para esgrima; Tiras de prática para esgrima; Alvos de esgrima; Sacos de treinamento para esgrima; Ferramentas de teste e manutenção de armas de esgrima
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Scherma > Ausili per allenamenti di scherma: Accessori per cavi passanti da scherma; Corde per il corpo per la scherma; Manichini per la scherma; Scarpe per scherma; Scarpe da ginnastica per scherma; Scarpe per affondi per scherma; Strisce per esercitarsi nella scherma; Obiettivi di scherma; Borse da allenamento per la scherma; Strumenti di test e manutenzione per armi da scherma
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Mačevanje > Pomagala za trening mačevanja: Dodaci za žice za tijelo za mačevanje; Žice za mačevanje; Lutke za mačevanje; Trenažeri za rad nogu u mačevanju; Trenažeri za držanje u mačevanju; Trenažeri za iskorake u mačevanju; Trake za vježbanje mačevanja; Mete za vježbanje mačevanja; Torbe za trening mačevanja; Alati za testiranje i održavanje oružja za mačevanje
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Fechtavimas > Fechtavimo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Fechtavimo kūno laidų priedai; Fechtavimo kūno laidai; Fechtavimo manekenai; Fechtavimo kojų darbo treniruokliai; Fechtavimo ginklo suėmimo treniruokliai; Fechtavimo įtūpstų treniruokliai; Fechtavimo treniruočių takeliai; Fechtavimo taikiniai; Fechtavimo treniruočių krepšiai; Fechtavimo ginklų testavimo ir priežiūros įrankiai
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fægtning > Træningshjælpemidler til fægtning: Tilbehør til kropsledninger til fægtning; Fægtekropssnore; Fægtedukker; Trænere til fægtefodarbejde; Trænere til fægtegreb; Trænere til fægtebevægelser; Fægteøvelsesstrimler; Fægtningsmål; Fægtetræningstasker; Værktøj til test og vedligeholdelse af fægtevåben
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fäktning > Hjälpmedel för fäktning: Tillbehör för kroppskablar för fäktning; Kroppsremmar för fäktning; Fäktningsdockor; Fotarbetestränare för fäktning; Grepptränare för fäktning; Fäktningsutfallstränare; Fäktningsträningsremmar; Fäktningsmål; Träningssäckar för fäktning; Test- och underhållsverktyg för fäktvapen
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Vívás > Vívás-edzési segédeszközök: Vívó testkábel-kiegészítők; Vívó testzsinórok; Vívóbabák; Vívó-lábedzők; Vívás-markolatedzők; Vívó-kitörésedzők; Vívó-gyakorlócsíkok; Vívócélpontok; Vívó-edzőtáskák; Vívófegyver-tesztelő és -karbantartó eszközök
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > การฟันดาบ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมฟันดาบ: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสายต่ออุปกรณ์ฟันดาบ; สายไฟที่เชื่อมตัวดาบ; หุ่นฟันดาบ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมฟุตเวิร์คในกีฬาฟันดาบ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกจับดาบ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมการแทงดาบ; แถบพื้นสำหรับฝึกฟันดาบ; เป้าสำหรับฟันดาบ; กระเป๋าฝึกซ้อมฟันดาบ; เครื่องมือทดสอบและบำรุงรักษาดาบฟันดาบ
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Šerm > Tréningové šermiarske pomôcky: Príslušenstvo na šerm; Šermiarske telové popruhy; Šermiarske figuríny; Trenažéry šermiarskej práce nôh; Trenažéry úchopu kordu; Trenažéry šermiarskeho výpadu; Cvičné šermiarske popruhy; Šermiarske terče; Tréningové tašky na šerm; Nástroje na testovanie a údržbu šermiarskych zbraní
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Фехтование > Тренировочный инвентарь для фехтования: Аксессуары для нательных шнуров для фехтования; Шнуры для фехтования; Тренажеры-манекены для фехтования; Инвентарь для отработки движений ног для фехтования; Инвентарь для отработки хвата для фехтования; Инвентарь для отработки выпадов для фехтования; Фехтовальные дорожки для тренировок; Мишени для фехтования; Сумки для тренировок по фехтованию; Инструменты для тестирования и обслуживания фехтовального оружия
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Schermen > Schermtrainingshulpmiddelen: Accessoires voor schermkabels; Schermlichaamskoorden; Schermdummy's; Schermvoetenwerktrainers; Schermgriptrainers; Schermlungetrainers; Schermoefenstroken; Schermdoelwitten; Schermtrainingszakken; Test- en onderhoudsgereedschap voor schermwapens
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Fencing > Fencing Training Aids: Fencing Body Cord Accessories; Fencing Body Cords; Fencing Dummies; Fencing Footwork Trainers; Fencing Grip Trainers; Fencing Lunge Trainers; Fencing Practice Strips; Fencing Targets; Fencing Training Bags; Fencing Weapon Testing & Maintenance Tools
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 擊劍 > 擊劍訓練輔助用具: 擊劍體線配件; 擊劍身體繩; 擊劍假人; 擊劍步法訓練器; 擊劍握力訓練器; 擊劍弓箭步訓練器; 擊劍練習帶; 擊劍靶; 擊劍訓練包; 擊劍武器測試與維護工具
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Scrimă > Articole pentru antrenament scrimă: Accesorii pentru fire de corp de scrimă; Corzi pentru scrimă; Manechine pentru scrimă; Articole antrenament pentru joc de picioare scrimă; Articole antrenament priză pentru scrimă; Articole antrenament fandare scrimă; Benzi de antrenament pentru scrimă; Ținte pentru antrenament; Saci pentru antrenament scrimă; Instrumente de testare și întreținere a armelor de scrimă
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 펜싱 > 펜싱 훈련 장비: 펜싱 바디 코드 액세서리; 펜싱 바디 코드; 펜싱 모형; 펜싱 풋워크 트레이너; 펜싱 그립 트레이너; 펜싱 런지 트레이너; 펜싱 연습용 스트립; 펜싱 타겟; 펜싱 트레이닝 백; 펜싱 무기 테스트 및 유지보수 도구
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Eskrim > Eskrim Eğitim Araçları: Eskrim vücut kablosu aksesuarları; Eskrim Vücut Kordonları; Eskrim Mankenleri; Eskrim Ayak Çalışması Eğitmenleri; Eskrim Kavrama Eğitmenleri; Eskrim Hamle Eğitmenleri; Eskrim Çalışma Şeritleri; Eskrim Hedefleri; Eskrim Antrenman Torbaları; Eskrim silahı test ve bakım aletleri
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Esgrima > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de esgrima: Accesorios para cables de cuerpo de esgrima; Cordones para el cuerpo de esgrima; Maniquíes de esgrima; Entrenadores de juego de pies de esgrima; Entrenadores de agarre de esgrima; Zapatillas de estocada de esgrima; Tiras de práctica de esgrima; Dianas de esgrima; Sacos de entrenamiento de esgrima; Herramientas de mantenimiento y prueba de armas de esgrima
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 击剑 > 击剑训练辅助用品: 击剑连接线配件; 击剑身体绑带; 击剑假人; 击剑步法训练器; 击剑握力训练器; 击剑弓步训练器; 击剑练习带; 击剑靶; 击剑训练包; 击剑武器测试与维护工具